Vermont, session 2025-2026, H614.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. FINDINGS
The General Assembly finds that:
(1) The peoples of the Abenaki First Nation of Odanak and the Abenaki
First Nation of Wôlinak are descendant communities of the Western Abenaki,
VT LEG #386133 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.614
2026 Page 2 of 10
whose ancestral homeland encompassed the territory now known as Vermont,
New Hampshire, and the adjacent regions of southern Québec.
(2) Archaeological, ethnohistorical, and linguistic scholarship locate the
Indigenous territory of the Western Abenaki in the Champlain Valley,
Connecticut River Basin, and adjoining lands, and recognize the movement
and consolidation of those peoples into the villages of Odanak and Wôlinak in
the early 18th century.
(3) The international instrument United Nations Declaration on the
Rights of Indigenous Peoples (UNDRIP), adopted on September 23, 2007,
articulates that Indigenous Peoples have the right to participate in decision-
making in matters that affect them and to maintain and strengthen their
institutions, cultures, traditions, and languages.
(4) Article 19 of UNDRIP provides that states shall “consult and
cooperate in good faith with the indigenous peoples concerned … in order to
obtain their free, prior and informed consent” before adopting legislative or
administrative measures that may affect them.
(5) Article 36(1) of UNDRIP recognizes that Indigenous Peoples,
especially those divided by international or other borders, have the right to
maintain and develop contacts, relations, and cooperation, including for
cultural, political, social, and economic purposes.
VT LEG #386133 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.614
2026 Page 3 of 10
(6) Article 14 of UNDRIP affirms that Indigenous Peoples have the
right to establish and control educational systems and institutions that reflect
their cultural methods of teaching and learning, and that states shall, in
conjunction with Indigenous Peoples, take effective measures to ensure that
Indigenous children have access to an education in their own culture and
language.
(7) Article 14 further recognizes that education concerning Indigenous
Peoples must be developed in cooperation with them, ensuring accuracy,
cultural integrity, and respect for Indigenous knowledge and identity.
Curriculum that addresses the history of the Abenaki people therefore directly
implicates the rights of the Abenaki First Nations of Odanak and Wôlinak.
(8) Article 31 of UNDRIP affirms that Indigenous Peoples have the
right to maintain, control, protect, and develop their cultural heritage,
traditional knowledge, and cultural expressions, including historical narratives,
oral traditions, and understandings of ancestral lands.
(9) Article 31 further provides that states shall take effective measures,
in conjunction with Indigenous Peoples, to recognize and protect the exercise
of these rights. Because educational curricula constitute one of the primary
vehicles through which cultural heritage and historical knowledge are
transmitted, the development and approval of curricula concerning the
Indigenous history of the land now called Vermont necessarily requires
VT LEG #386133 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.614
2026 Page 4 of 10
meaningful participation and endorsement from the actual Abenaki Nations,
whose heritage is being taught.
(10) Taken together, Articles 14, 19, 31, and 36 of UNDRIP establish
that states must collaborate with Indigenous Peoples in good faith; obtain their
free, prior, and informed consent when policies affect them; recognize their
authority over their own historical and cultural narratives; and respect their
inherent rights across international borders. Curriculum concerning Abenaki
history and culture falls squarely within these obligations.
(11) Historical and archaeological scholarship does not support a
distinction between “Canadian” and “Vermont” Abenaki as separate
Indigenous Peoples. The Abenaki First Nations of Odanak and Wôlinak are
the political, cultural, and genealogical successors of the Western Abenaki,
whose historical territory includes present-day Vermont.
(12) Because the ancestral territory of the Western Abenaki extended
across what is now the U.S.–Canada border and the contemporary Abenaki
First Nations of Odanak and Wôlinak hold membership and heritage that span
that border, the State of Vermont must respect their cross-border Indigenous
rights under Article 36 of UNDRIP.
(13) Education curricula addressing Indigenous history, culture, and
presence in the lands now comprising Vermont implicate the heritage, identity,
and cultural responsibility of the Abenaki First Nations of Odanak and
VT LEG #386133 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.614
2026 Page 5 of 10
Wôlinak; failing to secure their meaningful participation risks undermining the
accuracy, legitimacy, and integrity of such curricula.
(14) It is therefore appropriate for the State of Vermont, through the
Vermont Agency of Education, the Vermont State Board of Education, local
school districts, supervisory unions, and any institutions receiving school
groups for educational programming, to require consultation with and written
endorsement from the Abenaki First Nations of Odanak and Wôlinak before
adopting or presenting any curriculum or materials that address Indigenous
Peoples of the Vermont region.
Sec. 2. 16 V.S.A. § 913 is added to read:
§ 913. INDIGENOUS HISTORY AND CULTURE CURRICULUM
(a) Definitions. As used in this section:
(1) “Consultation” means meaningful engagement, sufficiently in
advance of curriculum adoption or material presentation, with representatives
of the Abenaki First Nations of Odanak and Wôlinak, providing relevant
materials, time for review, opportunity for adjustment, and a written record of
issues raised and responses.
(2) “Endorsement” means documented approval in writing by the
governing council of each of the Abenaki First Nations of Odanak and
Wôlinak, after reasonable opportunity for review, comment, and revision of the
proposed curriculum content.
VT LEG #386133 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.614
2026 Page 6 of 10
(3) “Indigenous history and culture curriculum” means any school
course, supplementary material, required book, module, or instructional
framework bearing on the history, culture, land-use, presence, or heritage of
Indigenous Peoples whose ancestral territory includes lands now within
Vermont, and which is proposed for adoption by the Agency of Education, the
State Board of Education, a supervisory union, a school district, an approved
independent school receiving public funds, or any museum, historical society,
or other institution that receives school groups for educational programming.
(4) “School district” has the same meaning as in subdivision 11(10) of
this title.
(5) “State-recognized tribe” means a tribe recognized by the State of
Vermont under Vermont law; provided, however, that for the purposes of this
section does not confer or imply federal recognition nor extend to using such
recognition as the basis for endorsement under this section.
(6) “Supervisory union” has the same meaning as in subdivision 11(23)
of this title.
(b) Consultation and endorsement.
(1) Before any Indigenous history and culture curriculum is submitted to
the State Board of Education or the Agency of Education; or adopted by a
supervisory union, school district, or approved independent school receiving
public funds; or before any museum, historical society, or other cultural or
VT LEG #386133 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.614
2026 Page 7 of 10
educational institution that receives school groups utilizes or presents materials
addressing the Indigenous history or culture of the land now called Vermont,
the proposing entity must:
(A) provide a draft of the curriculum or materials to the governing
councils of the Odanak and Wôlinak First Nations;
(B) engage in consultation as defined under subdivision (a)(1) of this
section; and
(C) obtain written endorsement from each of the Odanak and
Wôlinak First Nations as defined under subdivision (a)(2) of this section.
(2) The Agency of Education shall not approve; the State Board shall
not adopt; and no school district, supervisory union, approved independent
school receiving public funds, museum, historical society, or other institution
receiving school groups may implement such a curriculum or utilize such
materials without documentation that the required consultation occurred and
the endorsement was obtained.
(c) Guidance. The Agency of Education shall issue guidance to ensure
timely coordination, cost-neutral access to review for the Abenaki First
Nations of Odanak and Wôlinak, and deadlines for the endorsement process
and shall update curriculum approval procedures accordingly.
(d) Peer review. All Indigenous history and culture curricula and related
materials submitted for review under this section shall undergo a peer-review
VT LEG #386133 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.614
2026 Page 8 of 10
process conducted jointly with the Abenaki First Nations of Odanak and
Wôlinak to ensure that such materials are fact-based, historically accurate, and
free from ideological distortion or unsubstantiated claims.
(e) Governmental recognition. Nothing in this section grants any new
governmental recognition of the Abenaki First Nations of Odanak or Wôlinak
under State law beyond the consultation and endorsement rights expressed
here, nor does this act confer federal recognition or alter the legal status of any
State-recognized tribe other than to establish this separate curricular
consultation mechanism.
Sec. 3. REVIEW OF EXISTING CURRICULA
(a) On or before July 1, 2026, the Agency of Education shall compile a
comprehensive inventory of any curriculum, instructional material, required
book, or learning resource currently in use that addresses the history, culture,
or contemporary identity of Indigenous Peoples whose ancestral territories
include the land now called Vermont, including any such materials used by any
public or approved independent school, museums, historical societies, or other
institutions that receive school groups.
(b) The Agency shall provide the compiled inventory to the governing
councils of the Abenaki First Nations of Odanak and Wôlinak for:
(1) review of historical and cultural accuracy;
VT LEG #386133 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.614
2026 Page 9 of 10
(2) identification of any necessary corrections, clarifications, or
revisions;
(3) consultation consistent with the standards of free, prior, and
informed consent; and
(4) determination of whether the curriculum or material should be
endorsed, revised, or withdrawn.
(c) No Indigenous history and culture curriculum or material currently in
use shall remain in effect after July 1, 2026, unless:
(1) it has received written endorsement from both the Abenaki First
Nation of Odanak and the Abenaki First Nation of Wôlinak; or
(2) it has been revised to address concerns identified through the
consultation process and has subsequently received written endorsement from
both First Nations.
(d) The mandatory review of existing curricula and materials shall include
a peer-review process conducted jointly with the Abenaki First Nations of
Odanak and Wôlinak to ensure that all content is fact-based and historically
accurate.
(e) The Vermont Commission on Native American Affairs shall coordinate
with the Abenaki First Nations of Odanak and Wôlinak, as requested, solely
for purposes of facilitating the review and endorsement process laid out in this
section.
VT LEG #386133 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.614
2026 Page 10 of 10
Sec. 4. IMPLEMENTATION
The Agency of Education shall provide technical assistance and guidance to
supervisory unions, school districts, approved independent schools receiving
public funds, museums, historical societies, and other institutions receiving
school groups to ensure compliance with this act and shall also develop
timelines and transition plans necessary to retire nonendorsed materials and
adopt endorsed materials.
Sec. 5. EDUCATION QUALITY STANDARDS UPDATE; STATE BOARD
OF EDUCATION RULEMAKING
On or before January 1, 2027, the State Board of Education shall initiate
rulemaking pursuant to 3 V.S.A. chapter 25 to update education quality
standards contained in Agency of Education, Rule Series 2000—Education
Quality Standards (CVR 22-000-003) to ensure compliance with 16 V.S.A.
§ 913, including a requirement that any Indigenous history and culture
curriculum or related material must include a documented endorsement from
the Abenaki First Nations of Odanak and Wôlinak.
Sec. 6. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #386133 v.1